New York, session 2025-2026, A2608.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 4 of section 623 of the correction law, as 2 amended by chapter 322 of the laws of 2021, is amended to read as 3 follows: 4 4. (a) The department shall establish rules and regulations or depart- 5 mental procedures to ensure that any incarcerated individual phone call 6 system established by this section provides reasonable security measures 7 to preserve the safety and security of each correctional facility, all 8 staff and all persons outside a facility who may receive incarcerated 9 individual phone calls. 10 (b) Such rules and regulations shall include provisions requiring an 11 incarcerated individual who is placing a call to a family member who is 12 outside the continental United States, Canada, U.S. Virgin Islands, 13 Puerto Rico, Guam or Central Northern Mariana Islands to have the same 14 restrictions on the duration or number of calls, or use of unit or 15 facility phones, as an incarcerated individual who is calling a family 16 member who is not outside the continental United States, Canada, U.S. 17 Virgin Islands, Puerto Rico, Guam or Central Northern Mariana Islands. 18 § 2. This act shall take effect on the ninetieth day after it shall 19 have become a law. Effective immediately, the addition, amendment and/or 20 repeal of any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of 21 this act on its effective date are authorized to be made and completed 22 on or before such effective date. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD00833-01-5